Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Article 1. Designation, Marking, and Use.

Sec. 19.10.010.
Dedication of land for public highways.

A tract 100 feet wide between each section of land owned by the state, or acquired from the state, and a tract four rods wide between all other sections in the state, is dedicated for use as public highways.
The section line is the center of the dedicated right-of-way.
If the highway is vacated, title to the strip inures to the owner of the tract of which it formed a part by the original survey.

History.

(§ 1 ch 123 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 35 SLA 1953)

Administrative Code. —

For railroads, see 17 AAC 15, art. 4.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Each surveyed section in the state is subject to a section line right-of-way for construction of highways if, at any time between April 6, 1923 and January 18, 1949, or at any time after March 26, 1951 (March 21, 1953 for unreserved public land), it was owned by or acquired from the Territory or State of Alaska, or it was unreserved public land, see 1969 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 7.

Sec. 19.10.015.
Establishment of highway widths.

It is declared that all officially proposed and existing highways on public land not reserved for public uses are 100 feet wide. This section does not apply to highways that are specifically designated to be wider than 100 feet.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a municipality may designate the width of a road that is not a part of the state highway system if the municipality maintains the road.

History.

(§ 1 ch 35 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 158 SLA 1980)

Sec. 19.10.020.
Designation of state highway system.

The department may designate, locate, create, and determine what highways constitute the state highway system.
In designating, locating, creating, and determining the several routes of the state highway system, the department shall strive to attain the purposes and objectives set out in AS

19.05.125

.

History.

(§ 1 art III title II ch 152 SLA 1957)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 17 AAC 5.

For railroads, see 17 AAC 15, art. 4.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Although there is no specific grant of authority to the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities to transfer highways to a municipality, the power to effectuate such a transfer may be considered as implicit through the operation of AS

19.05.010

,

19.05.040

,

19.05.060

,

19.05.070

and this section. January 1, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 19.10.030.
Responsibility for system.

The department is responsible for the construction and maintenance of the state highway system.

History.

(§ 2 art III title II ch 152 SLA 1957)

Administrative Code. —

For maintenance, see 17 AAC 20.

For Anton Anderson memorial tunnel, see 17 AAC 38.

Sec. 19.10.040.
Uniform system of marking and posting.

The department shall classify, designate, and mark highways under its jurisdiction and shall provide a uniform system of marking and posting these highways. The system of marking and posting must correlate with and, as far as possible, conform to the recommendations of the Manual on Traffic Control Devices as adopted by the American Association of State Highway Officials.

History.

(§ 3 art III title II ch 152 SLA 1957)

Administrative Code. —

For utility standards and requirements, see 17 AAC 15, art. 2.

For railroads, see 17 AAC 15, art. 4.

For Anton Anderson memorial tunnel, see 17 AAC 38.

Sec. 19.10.050.
Traffic control signals.

The department shall prescribe types of traffic control signals to regulate traffic on highways.
These signals must correlate with and, as far as possible, conform to the recommendations of the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices as adopted by the American Association of State Highway Officials.
The department shall adopt uniform regulations for the placing and installation of traffic control signals.

History.

(§ 4 art III title II ch 152 SLA 1957)

Administrative Code. —

For driveway and approach road permits, see 17 AAC 10, art. 2.

For utility standards and requirements, see 17 AAC 15, art. 2.

For railroads, see 17 AAC 15, art. 4.

For Anton Anderson memorial tunnel, see 17 AAC 38.

Sec. 19.10.052.
[Renumbered as AS 19.20.017.]

Sec. 19.10.060.
Size, weight, and load provisions; restriction on use of highways; regulations.

The department, with respect to highways under its jurisdiction, may

establish limitations on weight, size, and load of vehicles, except as otherwise provided in AS

19.10.065

;

prohibit the operation or impose restrictions on vehicular use of highways during certain seasons of the year.

The department shall operate motor vehicle weighing stations, issue special written permits authorizing the operation of overweight and oversize vehicles, establish fees for the overweight and oversize vehicle special permits, enforce the size, weight, and load limitations adopted under this section, and establish regulations relating to pilot car services and the enforcement of the size, weight, and load limitations adopted under this section.

Except for requirements relating to a commercial motor vehicle driver’s licensing program under AS 28, the department shall adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) that are necessary to implement federal statutes or regulations that relate to commercial motor vehicles.

History.

(§ 5 art III title II ch 152 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 55 SLA 1963; am § 25 ch 144 SLA 1977; am § 2 ch 77 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 1987; am E.O. No. 98 § 3 (1997); am § 1 ch 80 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 2013)

Administrative Code. —

For commercial motor vehicles: size and weight, see 17 AAC 25, art. 1.

For commercial motor vehicles: safety and hazardous materials, see 17 AAC 25, art. 2.

For oversize and overweight vehicles, see 17 AAC 25, art. 3.

For waivers, see 17 AAC 25, art. 4.

For buses, see 17 AAC 28.

For toll highways, see 17 AAC 35.

For Anton Anderson memorial tunnel, see 17 AAC 38.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 8, 2013, in (c), substituted “federal statutes or regulations that relate to commercial motor vehicles” for “requirements imposed by federal statute or regulation that relate to commercial motor vehicles and that are necessary to avoid loss or withholding of federal highway money”.

Sec. 19.10.065.
Operation of farm equipment on highways.

Implements of husbandry, as defined by regulation under AS

28.05.011

, are not subject to restrictions adopted under AS

19.10.060(a)(1)

unless the implement is the load of another vehicle. Implements of husbandry may be operated on highways subject to the department’s jurisdiction without obtaining a permit, as provided in this section.

The incidental operation of an implement of husbandry up to 12 feet wide on a state highway is authorized without a permit if the implement

is operated only during the period from one-half hour after sunrise to one-half hour before sunset;

displays a slow-moving vehicle emblem on the rear of the implement;

displays a red flag on the implement in a location that affords greatest visibility; and

is moving from one farm operation to another within 50 miles of the home base of the implement of husbandry.

An implement of husbandry that is more than 12 feet wide may be operated on a state highway without a permit if it meets the provisions of (b) of this section and is preceded by a pilot car during operation on the highway.

History.

(§ 2 ch 26 SLA 1987)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1997, in subsection (a), “AS

19.10.060

(a)(1)” was substituted for “AS

19.10.060

(1)” to reflect the addition of AS

19.10.060(b)

and (c) by § 3, E.O. 98.

Sec. 19.10.070.
Speed limits and zones.

The department may conduct investigations with the assistance of the Department of Public Safety and shall determine safe speed limits and safe speed zones on highways and other roadways under its jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 6 art III title II ch 152 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 1986)

Collateral references. —

Legal aspects of speed bumps. 60 ALR4th 1249.

Sec. 19.10.072.
Procedures for determination of speed limits and zones.

In determining safe speed limits and safe speed zones, the department shall consider the following factors in the order of priority listed:

neighborhood safety, including the presence of children and pedestrian traffic;

the presence of schools, houses, parks, and crosswalks;

the presence of driveways, parked vehicles, and multiple turn locations;

that speed at which safe and prudent drivers could pass through the speed zone; and

the effectiveness of local enforcement of the speed zone.

In determining safe speed limits and safe speed zones within a municipality, the department shall consult with that municipality. In determining safe speed limits and safe speed zones on highways and other roadways under its jurisdiction, the department shall also consult with community councils or other community organizations in the affected area if the community councils or other community organizations request in writing to participate in the determination. The department shall provide notice and opportunity for a hearing before establishing a speed limit or speed zone other than as recommended by a municipality, community council, or other community organization.

History.

(§ 2 ch 23 SLA 1986)

Sec. 19.10.075.
Designation of traffic safety corridors; fines.

To promote traffic safety, the department may designate a portion of a highway to be a traffic safety corridor. The commissioner shall establish criteria for the designation and continuation of traffic safety corridors. In establishing the criteria, the commissioner may consider accident data and reports, the type and volume of vehicular traffic, engineering and traffic studies, and other relevant factors. Before the department designates a traffic safety corridor, the commissioner shall consult with the commissioner of public safety and shall consult with other local, state, and federal agencies with responsibility for traffic safety. A motor vehicle or traffic offense committed in a traffic safety corridor is subject to a double fine as provided in AS

28.90.030

. The department shall erect signs designating traffic safety corridors and alerting the public that motor vehicle and traffic offenses committed within a corridor are subject to double fines. A claim for damages may not be made against the state or its officers, employees, or agents for an act or omission relating to the designation of and erection of signs regarding a traffic safety corridor.

The legislature may appropriate 50 percent of the fines for offenses committed in a traffic safety corridor imposed under AS

28.90.030

and collected and separately accounted for by the state under AS

37.05.142

, to the division of the department responsible for highway safety planning, for highway safety programs.

History.

(§ 1 ch 45 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2007, “AS

28.90.030

” was substituted for “AS

28.40.070

” to reflect the 2006 renumbering of AS

28.40.070

.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 45, SLA 2006 (SB 261), relating to the designation of traffic safety corridors, see 2006 Senate Journal 2037 — 2038.

Sec. 19.10.080.
Designation of through highways.

The department may designate through highways by erecting stop signs at the entrances to them.

History.

(§ 7 art III title II ch 152 SLA 1957)

Sec. 19.10.085.
Naming of a highway.

A highway constructed by the department under AS 19.05 — AS 19.40 may be given a name only by law.

This section does not apply to

a road constructed by a municipality under a grant authorized by AS 19.05 — AS 19.40;

local service roads and trails.

History.

(§ 1 ch 4 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 19.05.150. Renumbered in 1981.

Cross references. —

For statutory provisions naming certain highways, see AS 35.40.

Sec. 19.10.090.
Erection and maintenance of guard rails.

The department may erect and maintain guard rails, stretch wires, and other devices on highways.

History.

(§ 8 art III title II ch 152 SLA 1957)

Sec. 19.10.095.
Signs promoting the use of safety belts and child safety devices.

The department may erect and maintain signs encouraging the use of safety belts and child safety devices at the site of a motor vehicle accident where a fatality occurred as the result of a person’s failing to use a safety belt or child safety device. This section does not limit the authority of the department to erect or maintain signs to protect the public safety and welfare of persons using the highways of the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 15 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 34 SLA 2009)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective September 15, 2009, added “and child safety devices” or similar, in the heading and throughout the section.

Sec. 19.10.100.
Closing highways.

When it is necessary to exclude traffic from any portion of a highway, the department may close that portion of the highway by posting in a conspicuous manner, at each end of the portion closed, suitable signs warning the public that the road is closed under authority of law, and by erecting suitable obstructions.

History.

(§ 8 art IV title II ch 152 SLA 1957)

Administrative Code. —

For maintenance, see 17 AAC 20.

For commercial motor vehicles: size and weight, see 17 AAC 25, art. 1.

For Anton Anderson memorial tunnel, see 17 AAC 38.